Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 33 Safety Responsibility Violations — General Provisions

31-33-1.
Accident reports.

The operator of every motor vehicle which is in any manner involved in an accident within this state, in which any person is killed or injured, or in which damage to the property of any one person, including the operator, in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is sustained, shall, within twenty-one (21) days after the accident, report the matter in writing to the division of motor vehicles. The report, the form of which shall be prescribed by the division of motor vehicles, shall contain information to enable the division of motor vehicles to determine whether the requirements for the deposit of security under chapters 31 and 32 of this title are inapplicable by reason of the existence of insurance or other exceptions specified in the chapters, and the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may regard the information given as true, until the contrary reasonably appears. If that operator is physically incapable of making the report, the owner of the motor vehicle involved in the accident shall, within twenty-one (21) days after learning of the accident, make the report. The operator or the owner shall furnish any additional relevant information that the division of motor vehicles shall require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-32-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-1

; P.L. 1968, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 40, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 48, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 274, § 1.

31-33-2.
Failure to file accident report.

Failure to report an accident as required in §

31-33-1

shall be punished by a fine as provided for in §

31-41.1-4

, and the division of motor vehicles shall suspend the license of the person failing to make report, or the nonresident’s operating privilege of the person, until a report has been filed and for any further period not to exceed thirty (30) days that the division of motor vehicles may fix.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-2

; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 8; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 124; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 12.

31-33-3.
Falsification of reports or proof of responsibility.

Any person who gives information required in a report or otherwise as provided for in §

31-33-1

, knowing or having reason to believe that the information is false, or who shall forge or, without authority, sign any evidence of proof of financial responsibility for the future as required by chapter 32 of this title or who files or offers for filing any evidence of proof knowing or having reason to believe that it is forged or signed without authority, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-4

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-3

.

31-33-4.
Transfer of registration to defeat purpose.

If an owner’s registration has been suspended under the provisions of chapter 31 or 32 of this title, the registration shall not be transferred, nor the vehicle in respect to which the registration was issued, be registered in any other name until the division of motor vehicles is satisfied that the transfer of registration is proposed in good faith and not for the purpose or with the effect of defeating the purposes of these chapters.

Nothing in this section shall in any way affect the rights of any conditional vendor, chattel mortgagee, or lessor of a vehicle registered in the name of another as owner who becomes subject to the provisions of this section.

The division of motor vehicles shall suspend the registration of any vehicle transferred in violation of the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-4

.

31-33-5.
Surrender of license and registration.

Any person whose license or registration shall have been suspended under any provision of chapter 31 or 32 of this title, or whose policy of insurance or bond, when required under it, shall have been canceled or terminated, shall immediately return his or her license and registration to the division of motor vehicles. If any person shall fail to return to the division of motor vehicles the license or registration as provided in these chapters, the division of motor vehicles shall immediately direct any peace officer to secure possession of it and to return the same to the division of motor vehicles.

Any person willfully failing to return a license or registration as required in subsection (a) of this section, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned not to exceed thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, §§ 31, 32; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-5

.

31-33-6.
Owner’s liability for acts of others.

Whenever any motor vehicle shall be used, operated, or caused to be operated upon any public highway of this state with the consent of the owner, lessee, or bailee, expressed or implied, the driver of it, if other than the owner, lessee, or bailee, shall in the case of an accident be deemed to be the agent of the owner, lessee, or bailee, of the motor vehicle unless the driver shall have furnished proof of financial responsibility in the amount set forth in chapter 32 of this title, prior to the accident. For the purposes of this section, the term “owner” includes any person, firm, copartnership, association, or corporation having the lawful possession or control of a motor vehicle under a written sale agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-6

; P.L. 2003, ch. 115, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 219, § 5; P.L. 2004, ch. 224, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 137, § 5.

31-33-7.
Prima facie evidence of consent of owner.

In all civil proceedings, evidence that at the time of the accident or collision the motor vehicle was registered in the name of the defendant, shall be prima facie evidence that it was being operated with the consent of the defendant, and the absence of consent shall be an affirmative defense to be set up in the answer and proved by the defendant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-4

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-7

; P.L. 1982, ch. 350, § 1.

31-33-8.
Assigned risk plans.

After consultation with the insurance companies authorized to issue automobile liability and/or physical damage policies in this state, the insurance commissioner shall approve a reasonable plan or plans, fair to the insurers and equitable to their policyholders, for the apportionment among the companies of applicants for motor vehicle liability and/or physical damage insurance who are in good faith entitled to but are unable to procure insurance through ordinary methods.

The plan or plans shall provide coverage for liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the vehicle or vehicles within the United States or the Dominion of Canada, up to a limit of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and, up to a limit of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one accident.

When any plan or plans have been approved, all the insurance companies shall subscribe to it or them and participate with respect to those types of insurance which they write in the state. Licensed non-resident insurance producers shall be allowed to submit applications to the plan or plans, provided that the state in which they hold a resident brokers license allows Rhode Island resident producers access to their respective plan or plans, or similar residual market mechanism.

Any applicant for insurance, any person insured under the plan, and any insurance company affected, may appeal to the insurance commissioner from any ruling or decision of a manager or committee designated to operate the plan or plans. Any order or act of the insurance commissioner under the provisions of this section shall be subject to review on petition filed by an aggrieved party in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol within ten (10) days after notice of it is given. The court shall determine whether the filing of the petition shall operate as a stay of any order or act of the insurance commissioner, and the court shall summarily hear the matter. The court may, in disposing of the issue before it, modify, affirm, or reverse the order or act of the insurance commissioner in whole or in part.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-9

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-8

; P.L. 1982, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 337, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 274, § 1.

31-33-8.1.
Joint distribution of accident reports.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, nothing shall prevent insurers providing automobile insurance coverage in the state from establishing and maintaining a common system for obtaining publicly filed accident reports and distributing the reports to the insurer or insurers identified on the form as providing coverage to one or more persons, whether through the assigned risk plan or otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 185, § 1.

31-33-9.
Self-insurers.

Any person in whose name more than twenty-five (25) vehicles are registered in this state may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance issued by the department of business regulation as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

The department of business regulation may, in its discretion, upon the application of such a person, issue a certificate of self-insurance when it is satisfied that the person is possessed, and will continue to be possessed of, the ability to pay judgment obtained against the person. The certificate may be issued authorizing a person to act as a self-insurer for either property damage or bodily injury, or both.

Upon not less than five (5) days’ notice and a hearing pursuant to notice, the department of business regulation may upon reasonable grounds cancel a certificate of self-insurance. Failure to pay any judgment within thirty (30) days after the judgment shall have become final shall constitute a reasonable ground for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance.

Entities applying to, or previously authorized to, permissibly self-insure are subject to the jurisdiction of the department of business regulation. The department of business regulation is authorized to promulgate and enforce rules and regulations that may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section including, but not limited to:

Obtaining and reviewing financial statements and related information necessary to ascertain the applicant’s ability to self-insure.

Apportioning the cost of review to the applicant in a manner similar to that utilized to charge insurance companies for review and analysis of their financial statements.

Imposing and enforcing upon entities authorized to permissibly self-insure any and all claims handling and settlement practices required of insurers in the settlement of claims.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-8

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-9

; P.L. 2014, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 36, § 1.

31-33-10.
Statement as to liability insurance not included in sale of vehicle.

Whenever any motor vehicle dealer licensed under chapter 5 of this title sells a motor vehicle at retail other than a cash sale, and the transaction for financing the purchase does not include the sale of liability insurance coverage which will protect the purchaser under the provisions of chapters 31 and 32 of this title, the purchase order or invoice or memorandum of conditional sales contract evidencing the transaction shall contain a statement in the following form:

The seller shall print or stamp the statement on the purchase order or invoice in distinctive colored ink and with clearly visible letters. The statement shall be signed by the purchaser and the seller in the space provided in it on or before the date of delivery of the motor vehicle described in the purchase order or invoice or memorandum of conditional sales contract, and a copy of the form shall be given to the purchaser by the seller.

“It is understood that insurance coverage which would protect the purchaser under the Rhode Island Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act is not included in the purchase of the motor vehicle described here. The purchaser has received a copy of this statement. (purchaser's signature) (seller's signature)”

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 47; P.L. 1955, ch. 3531, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-10

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-10

.

31-33-11.
Proof of responsibility for registration of vehicles owned by minors.

The division of motor vehicles shall not register any motor vehicle owned by any person under sixteen (16) years of age. The division of motor vehicles shall not register any motor vehicle owned by any person between sixteen (16) and eighteen (18) years of age unless the person shall furnish proof of financial responsibility for the future together with any certificate that the division of motor vehicles may require, signed by either parent, or the guardian of the person, approved or requesting the registration of the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 36; P.L. 1955, ch. 3501, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-11

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-11

.

31-33-12.
Proof of responsibility for registration of vehicles for hire.

The division of motor vehicles shall not register any motor vehicle for hire as defined in chapter 1 of this title until the owner of it shall furnish proof of financial responsibility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 36; P.L. 1955, ch. 3501, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-12

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-12

.

31-33-13.
Proof of responsibility to obtain dealers’ plates.

The division of motor vehicles shall not issue a registration under the provisions of §§

31-3-20

—

31-3-27

until the person applying for the registration shall furnish proof of financial responsibility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 36; P.L. 1955, ch. 3501, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-13

; P.L. 1959, ch. 123, § 4; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-13

.

31-33-14.
Return of registration plates on disposing of vehicle.

Any person who shall sell, lose possession of, or have destroyed by collision or fire, or who shall junk or otherwise dispose of any motor vehicle owned by or registered to that person, shall, in addition to returning the certificate of registration to the division of motor vehicles as required by chapter 4 of this title, immediately return to the custody of the division of motor vehicles, the number plates or markers issued under the registration certificates. If the number plates or markers are lost or destroyed, the owner of the motor vehicle to whom the number plates or markers were issued, shall file with the division of motor vehicles upon a form furnished by the division of motor vehicles, a statement under oath, satisfactory to the division of motor vehicles as to the circumstances surrounding the loss or destruction of the number plates or markers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-14

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-14

.

31-33-15.
Suspension of fraudulent registration of vehicle owned by minor.

The division of motor vehicles shall immediately suspend the registration of any motor vehicle if it appears to the division of motor vehicles that the motor vehicle is owned by a person under eighteen (18) years of age and that the person has secured the registration by a false statement of his or her age or that the motor vehicle has been registered in the name of a person not the true owner of it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-15

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-15

.

31-33-16.
Examination of vehicles and licenses on highways.

The division of motor vehicles may cause an examination to be made of all motor vehicles which at the time of the examination shall be found upon the public highways, and of the licenses of the operators in charge of the motor vehicles, and may verify numbers upon the engines of the motor vehicles as well as the numbers of the manufacturers thereon, and do and perform any other acts and demand and receive any other information that it may deem necessary to establish the ownership of the motor vehicles and the authority to operate the motor vehicles. For these purposes the division of motor vehicles may request the assistance of the division of state police or police authorities of any city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-16

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-16

.

31-33-17.
Other process preserved.

Nothing in chapters 31 — 33 of this title shall be construed as preventing the plaintiff in any action at law from relying for relief upon the other processes provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 42; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-20

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-17

.

31-33-18.
Short title.

Chapters 31 — 33 of this title may be cited as the “Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 45; G.L. 1956, §

31-31-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-33-18

.